Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-220 Revival. An insurer whose
certificate of authority has been suspended, revoked, or refused may
subsequently be authorized if:

(1) The grounds for the suspension, revocation, or
refusal no longer exist and the insurer is otherwise fully qualified; and

(2) The insurer has reimbursed the commissioner for
all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by virtue of the suspension,
revocation, or reinstatement of the certificate of authority. [L 1987, c 347,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next